lexd_components/hyw-verbs_kouyoumdjian.lexd
################################
#### Lexicon of verbs which are not present in Boyacioglu's verb list
### But which are present in Kouyoumdjian's dictionary A comprehensive dictionary Armenian-English

##Simple regular verbs
LEXICON VerbRootE(2) 		#Class 1 երգել and 2 քաղել
